Alaska statutes. Title 25. Marital and Domestic Relations.
Chapter 24. Divorce and Dissolution of Marriage.

Cross references. —

For provisions related to community property, see AS 34.77.

Collateral references. —

Parley and Lindey, Lindey on Separation Agreements and Antenuptial Contracts (Matthew Bender).

Rutkin, Troyan, and Blumberg, Valuation and Distribution of Marital Property (Matthew Bender).